Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5509YH (2) 91 da/js H.F. 2042 Section 1. STUDY ââ MERGER OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL 1 RESOURCES WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND 2 STEWARDSHIP. 3 1. The department of management shall conduct a study 4 regarding the possible merger of the department of natural 5 resources and the department of agriculture and land 6 stewardship. The department of management shall consider the 7 departmentsâ overlapping missions and programs, and the impact 8 of such merger upon the delivery of services, cost savings, and 9 administrative and enforcement efficiencies. The department of 10 management shall also consider the best methods to integrate 11 the two departments, including but not limited to matters 12 related to building space, management and personnel, equipment, 13 and computer systems. 14 2. The department of management shall prepare and submit 15 a report regarding its findings and recommendations to the 16 governor and general assembly not later than December 31, 2026. 17 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 18 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19